Utah statutes.
63M-1-3204.   STEM Action Center.

(1)  As funding allows, the board shall:

(a)  establish a STEM Action Center;

(b)  ensure that the STEM Action Center:

(i)  is accessible by the public; and

(ii)  includes the components described in Subsection (2);

(c)  work cooperatively with the State Board of Education to acquire technology and select schools as described in Sections 63M-1-3205 and 63M-1-3206; and

(d)  engage private entities to provide financial support or employee time for STEM activities in schools in addition to what is currently provided by private entities.

(2)  As funding allows, the executive director of the STEM Action Center shall:

(a)  support professional development for educators regarding education related instructional technology that supports STEM education;

(b)  ensure that the STEM Action Center acts as a research and development center for education related instructional technology acquired through a request for proposals process described in Section 63M-1-3205;

(c)  review and acquire STEM education related technology for:

(i)  educator professional development;

(ii)  assessment, data collection, analysis, and reporting; and

(iii)  public school instruction;

(d)  facilitate participation in interscholastic STEM related competitions, fairs, and camps;

(e)  engage private industry in the development and maintenance of the STEM Action Center;

(f)  use resources to bring the latest STEM education learning tools into public education classrooms;

(g)  identify at least 10 best practice innovations used in Utah schools that have resulted in at least 80% of students performing at grade level in STEM areas;

(h)  identify best practices being used outside the state and implement selected practices through a pilot program;

(i)  identify:

(i)  three learning tools for kindergarten through grade 6 identified as best practices; and

(ii)  three learning tools per STEM subject for grades 7 through 12 identified as best practices;

(j)  provide a Utah best practices database, including best practices from public education, higher education, the Utah Education Network, and other STEM related entities;

(k)  keep track of the following items related to the best practices database described in Subsection (2)(j):

(i)  how the best practices database is being used; and

(ii)  how many individuals are using the database, including the demographics of the users, if available;

(l)  join and participate in a national STEM network;

(m)  identify performance changes linked to use of the best practices database described in Subsection (2)(j);

(n)  work cooperatively with the State Board of Education to designate schools as STEM schools, where the schools have agreed to adopt a plan of STEM implementation in alignment with criteria set by the State Board of Education and the board;

(o)  support best methods of professional development, including methods of professional development that reduce cost and increase effectiveness, to help educators learn how to most effectively implement best practice learning tools in classrooms;

(p)  recognize a high school's achievement in the STEM competitions, fairs, and camps described in Subsection (2)(d);

(q)  send student results from STEM competitions, fairs, and camps described in Subsection (2)(d) to media and ask the media to report on them;

(r)  develop and distribute STEM toolkits to parents of students being served by the STEM Action Center;

(s)  support targeted professional development for improved instruction in STEM in grades 6, 7, and 8, including:

(i)  improved instructional materials that are dynamic and engaging for students;

(ii)  targeted instruction for students who traditionally avoid enrolling in STEM courses;

(iii)  introduction of engaging engineering courses; and

(iv)  introduction of other research-based methods that support student achievement in STEM areas; and

(t)  ensure that an online college readiness assessment tool be accessible by:

(i)  public education students; and

(ii)  higher education students.

(3)  The board may prescribe other duties for the STEM Action Center in addition to the responsibilities described in this section.

(4) (a)  The executive director shall track and compare the student performance of students participating in a STEM Action Center program to all other similarly situated students in the state, in the following STEM related activities, at the beginning and end of each year:

(i)  public education high school graduation rates;

(ii)  the number of students taking a remedial mathematics course at an institution of higher education described in Section 53B-2-101;

(iii)  the number of students who graduate from a Utah public school and begin a postsecondary education program; and

(iv)  the number of students, as compared to all similarly situated students, who are performing at grade level in STEM classes.

(b)  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Regents shall provide information to the board to assist the board in complying with the requirements of Subsection (4)(a) if allowed under federal law.



Enacted by Chapter 336, 2013 General Session

